California statutes. Corporations Code
Any cash distributions made by a limited liability company to a dissenting member after the date of consummation of the reorganization, but prior to any payment by the limited liability company for that dissenting member’s interest, shall be credited against the total amount to be paid by the limited liability company for such dissenting interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17711.10.

Except as expressly limited by this article, dissenting members shall continue to have all the rights and privileges incident to their interests immediately prior to the reorganization, including limited liability, until payment by the limited liability company for their dissenting interests. A dissenting member may not withdraw a demand for payment unless the limited liability company consents thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17711.11.

A dissenting interest loses its status as a dissenting interest and the holder thereof ceases to be a dissenting member and ceases to be entitled to require the limited liability company to purchase the interest upon the happening of any of the following:

(a) The limited liability company abandons the reorganization.

Upon abandonment of the reorganization, the limited liability company shall pay, on demand, to any dissenting member who has initiated proceeding in good faith under this article, all reasonable expenses incurred in such proceedings and reasonable attorney’s fees.

(b) The interest is transferred prior to its submission for endorsement in accordance with Section 17711.04.

(c) The dissenting member and the limited liability company do not agree upon the status of the interest as a dissenting interest or upon the purchase price of the dissenting interest, and neither files a complaint nor intervenes in a pending action, as provided in Section 17711.06, within six months after the date upon which notice of the approval of the reorganization by the requisite vote or consent of members was mailed to the member.

(d) The dissenting member, with the consent of the limited liability company, withdraws the member’s demand for purchase of the dissenting interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17711.12.

If litigation is instituted to test the sufficiency or regularity of the vote or consent of the members in authorizing a reorganization, any proceedings under Sections 17711.06 and 17711.07 shall be suspended until final determination of that litigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17711.13.

(a) This article applies to the following:

(1) A domestic limited liability company formed on or after January 1, 2014.

(2) A foreign limited liability company if the foreign limited liability company was formed on or after January 1, 2014, or filed an application to qualify to do business on or after January 1, 2014, and members holding more than 50 percent of the voting power held by all members of the foreign limited liability company reside in this state.

(3) A limited liability company if the operating agreement so provides or if all
 managers and a majority of the members, if it is a manager-managed limited liability company, or a majority, if it is a member-managed limited liability company, determine that this article shall apply.

(b) This article does not apply to membership interests governed by operating agreements whose terms and provisions specifically set forth the amount to be paid in respect of those interests in the event of a reorganization of the limited liability company, or to any limited liability company with 35 or fewer members if all the members have waived the application of this article in writing, whether in an operating agreement or otherwise, provided that if, at the time of the reorganization, the limited liability company had more than 35 members, any waiver shall be ineffective as to that reorganization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17711.14.

(a) No member of a limited liability company who has a right under this article to demand payment of cash for the interest owned by a member in a limited liability company shall have any right at law or in equity to attack the validity of the reorganization, or to have the reorganization set aside or rescinded, except in an action to test whether the vote or consent of members required to authorize or approve the reorganization has been obtained in accordance with the procedures established therefor by the operating agreement of the limited liability company.

(b) If one of the parties to a reorganization is directly or indirectly controlled by, or under common
 control with, another party to the reorganization, subdivision (a) shall not apply to any member of the controlled party who has not demanded payment of cash for the member’s interest pursuant to this article; but if the member institutes any action to attack the validity of the reorganization or to have the reorganization set aside or rescinded, the member shall not thereafter have any right to demand payment of cash for the member’s interest pursuant to this article.

(c) If one of the parties to a reorganization is directly or indirectly controlled by, or under common control with, another party to the reorganization, then, in any action to attack the validity of the reorganization or to have the reorganization set aside or rescinded, both of the following apply:

(1) A party to a
 reorganization that controls another party to a reorganization shall have the burden of proving that the transaction is just and reasonable as to the members of the controlled party.

(2) A person that controls two or more parties to a reorganization shall have the burden of proving that the transaction is just and reasonable as to the members of any party so controlled.

(d) Subdivisions (b) and (c) shall not apply if a majority of the members other than members who are directly or indirectly controlled by, or under common control with, another party to the reorganization approve or consent to the reorganization.

(e) This section shall not prevent a member of a limited liability company that is a party to a reorganization from
 bringing an action against a manager of the limited liability company, the limited liability company, or any person controlling a manager at law or in equity as to any matters, including, without limitation, an action for breach of fiduciary obligation or fraud, other than to attack the validity of the reorganization or to have the reorganization set aside or rescinded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------



ARTICLE 12. Class Provisions [17712.01. - 17712.01.]

17712.01.

The articles of organization or the operating agreement may provide for the creation of classes of members having those relative rights, powers, and duties as the articles of organization or operating agreement may provide, including rights, powers, and duties senior to other classes of members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------



ARTICLE 13. Miscellaneous Provisions [17713.01. - 17713.13.]

17713.01.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17713.02.

This title modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c)), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17713.03.

This title does not affect an action commenced, proceeding brought, or right accrued or accruing before this title takes effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17713.04.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), this title shall apply to all domestic limited liability companies existing on or after January 1, 2014, to all foreign limited liability companies registered with the Secretary of State prior to January 1, 2014, whose registrations have not been canceled as of January 1, 2014, to all foreign limited liability companies registered with the Secretary of State on or after January 1, 2014, and to all actions taken by the managers or members of a limited liability company on or after that date.

(b) Except as otherwise specified in this title, this title applies only to the acts or transactions by a limited liability company or by the members or managers of the
 limited liability company occurring, or an operating agreement or other contracts entered into by the limited liability company or by the members or managers of the limited liability company, on or after January 1, 2014. The prior law governs all acts or transactions by a limited liability company or by the members or managers of the limited liability company occurring, and any operating agreement or other contracts entered into by the limited liability company or by the members or managers of the limited liability company, prior to January 1, 2014.

(c) Any vote or consent by the managers or members of a limited liability company prior to January 1, 2014, shall be governed by prior law. If a certificate or document is required to be filed in a public office of this state relating to a vote or consent by the managers or members of the limited liability company prior to January 1, 2014, it may be filed after that date pursuant to the filing
 requirements of this title, even though the vote or consent is governed by prior law.

(d) This title does not cancel or otherwise affect the status of, or create a new filing requirement with the Secretary of State or any other agency, board, commission, or department for, any domestic limited liability company in existence on December 31, 2013, or any foreign limited liability company registered to transact intrastate business in this state prior to January 1, 2014.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “prior law” means Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 17000) as it read on December 31, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 775, Sec. 21.   (AB 506)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17713.05.

This title, or any division, part, chapter, article, or section thereof, may at any time be amended or repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17713.06.

(a) If a manager or member required by this title to execute or file any document fails, after demand, to do so within a reasonable time or refuses to do so, any other manager or member, or any person appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction, may prepare, execute, and file that document with the Secretary of State.

(b) If there is any dispute concerning the filing of a document, or the failure to file a document, any manager or member may petition the superior court to direct the execution of the document.

(c) If the court finds that it is proper for the document to be executed and that any person
 so designated has failed or refused to execute the document, or if the court determines that any document should be filed, it shall order a party to file the document, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State if appropriate, as ordered by the court.

(d) In any action under this section, if the court finds the failure of the manager or member to comply with the requirement to file any document to have been without justification, the court may award an amount sufficient to reimburse the managers or members bringing the action for the reasonable expenses incurred by them, including attorney’s fees, in connection with the action or proceeding.

(e) Any member who is not a manager, or any person filing any document under this section, shall state the statutory authority after
 the signature on the appropriate document.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17713.07.

(a) Every limited liability company that neglects, fails, or refuses to keep or cause to be kept or maintained the documents, books, and records required by Section 17701.13 to be kept or maintained shall be subject to a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each day that the failure or refusal continues, beginning 30 days after receipt of written request by any member that the duty be performed, up to a maximum of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500). The penalty shall be paid to the member or members jointly making the request for performance of the duty and damaged by the neglect, failure, or refusal, if suit therefor is commenced within 90 days after the written request is made; but the maximum daily penalty
 because of failure to comply with any number of separate requests made on any one day or for the same act shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(b) Upon the failure of a limited liability company, or a foreign limited liability company registered to transact intrastate business in this state, to file the statement required by Section 17702.09, the Secretary of State shall provide a notice of that delinquency to the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company. The notice shall also contain information concerning the application of this section, advise the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company of the penalty imposed by this subdivision for failure to timely file the required statement after notice of delinquency has been provided by the Secretary of State, and shall advise the limited liability
 company or foreign limited liability company of its right to request relief from the Secretary of State because of reasonable cause or unusual circumstances that justify the failure to file. If, within 60 days after providing notice of the delinquency, a statement pursuant to Section 17702.09 has not been filed by the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company, the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company shall be subject to a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17713.08.

Any penalty prescribed by Section 17713.07 shall be in addition to any remedy by injunction or action for damages or by writ of mandate for the nonperformance of acts and duties enjoined by law upon the limited liability company or its managers, including, without limitation, the remedies provided in subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section 17704.10. The court in which an action for any penalty is brought may reduce, remit, or suspend the penalty on any terms and conditions as it may deem reasonable when it is made to appear that the neglect, failure, or refusal was inadvertent or excusable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17713.09.

(a) Upon the failure of a limited liability company to file the statement required by Section 17702.09, the Secretary of State shall provide a notice of the delinquency to the limited liability company. The notice shall also contain information concerning the application of this section, advise the limited liability company of the penalty imposed by Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for failure to timely file the required statement after notice of delinquency has been mailed by the Secretary of State, and shall advise the limited liability company of its right to request relief from the Secretary of State because of reasonable cause or unusual circumstances that justify such failure to file. If, within 60 days
 after providing notice of the delinquency, a statement pursuant to Section 17702.09 has not been filed by the limited liability company, the Secretary of State shall certify the name of such limited liability company to the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) Upon certification pursuant to subdivision (a), the Franchise Tax Board shall assess against the limited liability company the penalty provided in Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) The penalty provided by Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall not apply to a limited liability company that on or prior to the date of certification pursuant to subdivision (a) has been canceled, has been merged into another limited liability company, other business entity, foreign other business entity, or foreign limited
 liability company, or has converted into another foreign business entity, foreign other business entity, or foreign limited liability company.

(d) The penalty herein provided shall not apply and the Secretary of State need not provide notice of the delinquency to a limited liability company the powers, rights, and privileges of which have been suspended by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 23301, 23301.5, or 23775 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on or prior to, and remain suspended on, the last day of the filing period pursuant to Section 17702.09. The Secretary of State need not provide notice of the filing requirement pursuant to Section 17702.09 to a limited liability company the powers, rights, and privileges of which have been so suspended by the Franchise Tax Board on or prior to, and remain suspended on, the day the Secretary
 of State prepares the notice for sending.

(e) If, after certification pursuant to subdivision (a) the Secretary of State finds (1) the required statement was filed or the required fee was paid before the expiration of the 60-day period after providing notice of the delinquency, or (2) the failure to provide notice of delinquency was due to an error of the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall promptly decertify the name of the limited liability company to the Franchise Tax Board. The Franchise Tax Board shall then promptly abate any penalty assessed against the limited liability company pursuant to Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(f) If the Secretary of State determines that the failure of a limited liability company to file the statement required by Section 17702.09
 is excusable because of reasonable cause or unusual circumstances that justify such failure, the Secretary of State may waive the penalty imposed by this section and by Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, in which case the Secretary of State shall not certify the name of the limited liability company to the Franchise Tax Board, or if already certified, the Secretary of State shall promptly decertify the name of the limited liability company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17713.10.

(a) A limited liability company that (1) fails to file a statement pursuant to Section 17702.09 for an applicable filing period, (2) has not filed a statement pursuant to Section 17702.09 during the preceding 24 months, and (3) was certified for penalty pursuant to Section 17713.09 for the same filing period, shall be subject to suspension pursuant to this section rather than to penalty pursuant to Section 17713.09.

(b) When subdivision (a) is applicable, the Secretary of State shall notify the limited liability company that its powers, rights, and privileges will be suspended after 60 days if it fails to file a statement pursuant to Section 17702.09.

(c) After the expiration of the 60-day period without any statement filed pursuant to Section 17702.09, the Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the suspension, and shall provide a notice of the suspension to the limited liability company and thereupon, except for the purpose of amending the articles of organization to set forth a new name, the powers, rights, and privileges of the limited liability company are suspended.

(d) A statement pursuant to Section 17702.09 may be filed notwithstanding suspension of the powers, rights, and privileges pursuant to this section or Section 23301 or 23301.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Upon the filing of a statement pursuant to Section 17702.09 by a limited liability company that has suffered suspension pursuant to
 this section, the Secretary of State shall certify that fact to the Franchise Tax Board and the limited liability company may thereupon be relieved from suspension unless the limited liability company is held in suspension by the Franchise Tax Board by reason of Section 23301 or 23301.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17713.10.1.

(a) A domestic limited liability company, as described in subdivisions (g) and (k) of Section 17701.02, may be subject to administrative cancellation pursuant to this section if, as of January 1, 2019, or at any time thereafter, the limited liability company’s powers, rights, and privileges are, and have been, suspended by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 23301) of Chapter 2 of Part 11 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for a period of not less than 60 continuous months.

(b) Prior to administrative cancellation of the limited liability company, the limited liability company shall be notified of the pending administrative cancellation as follows:

(1) The Franchise Tax Board shall mail written notice to the last known address of the limited liability company.

(2) If the limited liability company does not have a valid address in the records of the Franchise Tax Board, the notice provided in subdivision (d) shall be deemed sufficient notice prior to administrative cancellation.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board shall transmit to the Secretary of State the names and Secretary of State file numbers of limited liability companies subject to administrative cancellation pursuant to this section.

(d) The Secretary of State shall provide 60 days’ notice of the pending administrative cancellation on its Internet Web site by listing the limited liability company’s name and the Secretary of State’s file number. The
 Secretary of State shall also, in conjunction with the information above, provide instructions for the limited liability company to submit a written objection of the pending administrative cancellation to the Franchise Tax Board, before expiration of the 60 day’s notice.

(e) (1) A limited liability company may provide the Franchise Tax Board with a written objection to the administrative cancellation.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Secretary of State if a written objection has been received.

(f) If a written objection to the administrative cancellation is not received by the Franchise Tax Board during the 60-day period described in subdivision (d), the limited liability company shall be administratively canceled pursuant to this section. The certificate of the Secretary of State
 shall be prima facie evidence of the administrative cancellation.

(g) (1) If the written objection of a limited liability company to the administrative cancellation has been received by the Franchise Tax Board before the expiration of the 60-day period described in subdivision (d), that limited liability company shall have an additional 90 days from the date the written objection is received by the Franchise Tax Board to file returns and pay or otherwise satisfy all accrued taxes, penalties, and interest, file a current Statement of Information with the Secretary of State, change the entity name if no longer available, and fulfill any other requirements to be eligible and apply for revivor.

(2) (A) If the conditions in paragraph (1) are satisfied, the administrative cancellation shall be withdrawn.

(B) If the conditions in paragraph (1) are not satisfied, the limited liability company shall be administratively canceled pursuant to this section as of the later of the date that is 90 days after the receipt of the written objection or after the period in paragraph (3), if so extended.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board may extend the 90-day period in paragraph (1), but for no more than one period of 90 days.

(h) Upon administrative cancellation in accordance with this section, the limited liability company’s liabilities for qualified taxes, interest, and penalties, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 23310 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, if any, shall be abated.

(i) Any actions taken by the Franchise Tax Board to collect the abated
 liability shall be released, withdrawn, or otherwise terminated by the Franchise Tax Board and no subsequent administrative or civil action shall be taken or brought to collect all or part of that amount. Any amounts erroneously received by the Franchise Tax Board in contravention of this section may be credited and refunded in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 19301) of Chapter 6 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(j) An administrative appeal, writ, or other judicial action shall not be taken from the Franchise Tax Board’s or the Secretary of State’s actions under this section except as provided under subdivision (i) related to repayment of amounts erroneously received after administrative cancellation has occurred. 

(k) Upon administrative cancellation, the limited liability company’s rights, powers, and privileges shall cease.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 679, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17713.11.

(a) Sections 17713.09 and 17713.10 apply to foreign limited liability companies with respect to the statements required to be filed by Section 17702.09. For this purpose, the suspension of the powers, rights, and privileges of a domestic limited liability company shall mean the forfeiture of the exercise of the powers, rights, and privileges of a foreign limited liability company in this state.

(b) The forfeiture of the exercise of the powers, rights, and privileges of a foreign limited liability company in this state as used in subdivision (a) does not prohibit the transaction of business in this state by a foreign limited liability company if the business transacted
 subsequent to the forfeiture would not, considered as an entirety, require the foreign limited liability company to obtain a certificate of registration pursuant to Section 17708.02.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17713.12.

(a) A limited liability company is liable for a civil penalty in an amount not exceeding one million dollars ($1,000,000) if the limited liability company does both of the following:

(1) Has actual knowledge that a member, officer, manager, or agent of the limited liability company does any of the following:

(A) Makes, publishes, or posts, or has made, published, or posted, either generally or privately to the members or other persons, either of the following:

(i) An oral, written, or electronically transmitted report, exhibit, notice, or statement of its affairs or pecuniary condition that contains a material statement or omission
 that is false and intended to give membership shares in the limited liability company a materially greater or a materially less apparent market value than they really possess.

(ii) An oral, written, or electronically transmitted report, prospectus, account, or statement of operations, values, business, profits, or expenditures that includes a material false statement or omission intended to give membership shares in the limited liability company a materially greater or a materially less apparent market value than they really possess.

(B) Refuses or has refused to make any book entry or post any notice required by law in the manner required by law.

(C) Misstates or conceals or has misstated or concealed from a regulatory body a material fact in order to deceive a regulatory body to avoid a statutory or regulatory
 duty, or to avoid a statutory or regulatory limit or prohibition.

(2) Within 30 days after actual knowledge is acquired of the actions described in paragraph (1), the limited liability company knowingly fails to do both of the following:

(A) Notify the Attorney General or appropriate government agency in writing, unless the limited liability company has actual knowledge that the Attorney General or appropriate government agency has been notified.

(B) Notify its members and investors in writing, unless the limited liability company has actual knowledge that the members and investors have been notified.

(b) The requirement for notification under this section is not applicable if the action taken or about to be taken by the limited liability company, or by
 a member, officer, manager, or agent of the limited liability company under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), is abated within the time prescribed for reporting, unless the appropriate government agency requires disclosure by regulation.

(c) If the action reported to the Attorney General pursuant to this section implicates the government authority of an agency other than the Attorney General, the Attorney General shall promptly forward the written notice to that agency.

(d) If the Attorney General was not notified pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), but the limited liability company reasonably and in good faith believed that it had complied with the notification requirements of this section by notifying a government agency listed in paragraph (5) of subdivision (e), no penalties shall apply.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Manager” means a person defined by subdivision (m) of Section 17701.01 having both of the following:

(A) Management authority over the limited liability company.

(B) Significant responsibility for an aspect of the limited liability company that includes actual authority for the financial operations or financial transactions of the limited liability company.

(2) “Agent” means a person or entity authorized by the limited liability company to make representations to the public about the limited liability company’s financial condition and who is acting within the scope of the agency when the representations are made.

(3) “Member” means a
 person as defined by subdivision (o) of Section 17701.01 that is a member of the limited liability company at the time the disclosure is required pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(4) “Notify its members” means to give sufficient description of an action taken or about to be taken that would constitute acts or omissions as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). A notice or report filed by a limited liability company with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission that relates to the facts and circumstances giving rise to an obligation under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall satisfy all notice requirements arising under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) but shall not be the exclusive means of satisfying the notice requirements, provided that the Attorney General or appropriate agency is informed in writing that the filing has been made together with a copy of the filing or an electronic link
 where it is available online without charge.

(5) “Appropriate government agency” means an agency on the following list that has regulatory authority with respect to the financial operations of a limited liability company:

(A) Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(B) Department of Insurance.

(C) Department of Managed Health Care.

(D) United States Securities and Exchange Commission.

(6) “Actual knowledge of the limited liability company” means the knowledge a member, officer, or manager of a limited liability company actually possesses or does not consciously avoid possessing, based on an evaluation of
 information provided pursuant to the limited liability company’s disclosure controls and procedures.

(7) “Refuse to make a book entry” means the intentional decision not to record an accounting transaction when all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The independent auditors required recordation of an accounting transaction during the course of an audit.

(B) The audit committee of the limited liability company has not approved the independent auditor’s recommendation.

(C) The decision is made for the primary purpose of rendering the financial statements materially false or misleading.

(8) “Refuse to post any notice required by law” means an intentional decision not to post a
 notice required by law when all of the following conditions exist:

(A) The decision not to post the notice has not been approved by the limited liability company’s audit committee.

(B) The decision is intended to give the membership shares in the limited liability company a materially greater or a materially less apparent market value than they really possess.

(9) “Misstate or conceal material facts from a regulatory body” means an intentional decision not to disclose material facts when all of the following conditions exist:

(A) The decision not to disclose material facts has not been approved by the limited liability company’s audit committee.

(B) The decision is intended to give the
 membership shares in the limited liability company a materially greater or a materially less apparent market value than they really possess.

(10) “Material false statement or omission” means an untrue statement of material fact or an omission to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made under the circumstances under which they were made not misleading.

(11) “Officer” means a person appointed pursuant to Section 17703.02, except an officer of a specified subsidiary limited liability company who is not also an officer of the parent limited liability company.

(f) This section only applies to limited liability companies that are issuers, as defined in Section 2 of the federal Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7201 et seq.).

(g) An action to enforce this section may only be brought by the Attorney General or a district attorney or city attorney in the name of the people of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 67.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17713.13.

This title shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

TITLE 3. UNINCORPORATED ASSOCIATIONS [18000. - 24001.5.]



PART 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS [18000. - 18420.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [18000. - 18035.]

18000.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 178, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

18003.

“Board” means the board of directors or other governing body of an unincorporated association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 116, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

18005.

“Director” means a natural person serving as a member of the board or other governing body of the unincorporated association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 116, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

18008.

“Governing document” means a constitution, articles of association, bylaws, or other writing that governs the purpose or operation of an unincorporated association or the rights or obligations of its members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 116, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

18010.

“Governing principles” means the principles stated in an unincorporated association’s governing documents. If an association has no governing documents or the governing documents do not include a provision governing an issue, the association’s governing principles regarding that issue may be inferred from its established practices. For the purpose of this section, “established practices” means the practices used by an unincorporated association without material change or exception during the most recent five years of its existence, or if it has existed for less than five years, during its entire existence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 116, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

18015.

(a) If the governing principles of an unincorporated association define the membership of the association, “member” has the meaning provided by the governing principles.

(b) If the governing principles of an unincorporated association do not define the membership of the association, “member” means a person who, pursuant to the governing principles of the unincorporated association, has a right to participate in the selection of persons authorized to manage the affairs of the unincorporated association or in the development of policy of the unincorporated association, but does not include a person who participates solely as director, officer, or agent of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 178, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

18020.

(a) “Nonprofit association” means an unincorporated association with a primary common purpose other than to operate a business for profit.

(b) A nonprofit association may carry on a business for profit and apply any profit that results from the business activity to any activity in which it may lawfully engage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 178, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)